New Jersey, session 221, A3604.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Lactation accommodations in airports. a.     Any airport maintained or operated by the Port Authority that has 1,000,000 or more enplanements a year shall provide a room or other location at each airport passenger terminal behind the terminal security screening area for members of the public to express breast milk in private that meets the following conditions: (1) includes, at a minimum, a chair and an electrical outlet; (2) is located outside of the confines of a public restroom; and (3) upon completion of the construction of a new  passenger  terminal, or the replacement, expansion, or renovation of an existing passenger terminal, includes a sink. b.    Any airport maintained or operated by the Port Authority that has fewer than 1,000,000 but more than 10,000 enplanements a year shall, upon completion of the construction of a new passenger terminal, or the replacement, expansion, or renovation of an existing passenger terminal, provide a room or other location at each airport passenger terminal behind the terminal security screening area for members of the public to express breast milk in private that meets the following conditions: (1) includes, at a minimum, a chair, a sink, and an electrical outlet; and (2) is located outside of the confines of a public restroom. c.     As used in this section, "renovation of an existing passenger terminal" means the repurposing of more than 25 percent of the space in the passenger terminal. 2.    This act shall take effect upon the enactment into law by the State of New York of legislation having an identical effect, but if the State of New York shall have already enacted such legislation, then this act shall take effect immediately. Provisions unrelated to the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey that are included in such legislation in the State of New York shall not be construed to render the legislation as not having an identical effect.